West Virginia, session 2025, HB3038.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 5T. Office of Drug Control Policy. §16-5T-8.  Establishment of quick response teams. Subject to the policy requirements of this article, and in coordination with health care providers, law-enforcement agencies, emergency medical services, and health care facilities of this state, the Director of the Office of Drug Control Policy shall establish a plan for creating quick response teams (QRT) to serve as a first responder unit in narcotic-related medical emergencies effective July 1, 2025. A quick response team shall be trained to serve and to work with drug addicted persons immediately following their arrest at the regional jails, or at a treatment facility, to address a first step to recovery for those suffering from substance abuse.